South Dakota, session 2026, SB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 3-12C-113 be AMENDED:
3-12C-113. For purposes of this chapter, "Internal Revenue Code" or "code"
means the United States Internal Revenue Code (January 1, 2026).

26.550.10 2 50
An Act to update the reference to the Internal Revenue Code to reflect current federal law for
the administration of South Dakota Retirement System statutes.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 50
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 50 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB50 ENROLLED